Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.050

Retention of property by pawnbrokers—Inspection.

Property bought or received in pledge by any pawnbroker shall not be removed from that place of business, except when redeemed by, or returned to the owner, within thirty days after the receipt of the property. Property shall at all times during the ordinary hours of business be open to inspection to any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

[ 1991 c 323 s 5; 1984 c 10 s 8; 1909 c 249 s 232; RRS s 2484.]

NOTES:

Auction of secondhand property, exemption by rule of department of licensing: RCW 18.11.075.

Restoration of stolen property: RCW 9.54.130.